District of Columbia statutes.
22-1317

Flying fire balloons or parachutes.

It shall not be lawful for any person or persons to set up or fly any fire balloon or parachute in or upon or over any street, avenue, alley, open space, public enclosure, or square within the limits of the City of Washington, under a penalty of not more than $10 for each and every such offense.

July 29, 1892, 27 Stat. 322, ch. 320, § 4
Feb. 11, 1895, 28 Stat. 650, ch. 79
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 667, Pub. L. 91-358, title VIII, § 802
1973 Ed., § 22-1117.
1981 Ed., § 22-1117.
Conduct of prosecutions under this section, see § 22-1809.